apertium-es-ia.ia.dix
    <pardef n="canta/r__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rea</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nte</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cred/er__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eva</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erea</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ente</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="parti/r__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rea</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ente</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>r<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/esser__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esser</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sia</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>esse</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>son</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>somos</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esseva</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sera</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esserea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>serea</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essente</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>essete</l>
          <r>esser<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="cantar"><i>canta</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mangiar"><i>mangia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amar"><i>ama</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="renunciar"><i>renuncia</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contemplar"><i>contempla</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="demandar"><i>demanda</i><par n="canta/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="creder"><i>cred</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vider"><i>vid</i><par n="cred/er__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="partir"><i>parti</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="morir"><i>mori</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="audir"><i>audi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dormir"><i>dormi</i><par n="parti/r__vblex"/></e>
